California statutes. Public Resources Code
(1) While meeting the requirements of this section to the maximum extent practicable, the department, in consultation with the State Air Resources Board, shall conduct a technological assessment of zero-emission vehicle technology for vehicles with a gross vehicle weight rating of 19,000 pounds or more. The technological assessment shall include a
 plan to address the issues preventing the department and other state entities from meeting the requirements of this section.

(2) The department shall implement the plan developed pursuant to paragraph (1) for a period of at least one year.

(3) If, after the one-year period specified in paragraph (2), the department, in a public hearing, finds that it still cannot meet the needs of the state while meeting the requirements of this section, the department shall disclose that finding at the hearing and shall notify the Legislature of the finding in compliance with Section 9795 of the Government Code.

(e) This section is inoperative on the date on which the Department of General Services notifies the Legislature pursuant to paragraph (3) of subdivision (d) and is repealed on January 1 of the following
 year.

(History: Added by Stats. 2017, Ch. 639, Sec. 1.   (AB 739)   Effective January 1, 2018.   Inoperative on date prescribed by its own provisions.   Repealed, by its own provisions, on January 1 following inoperative date.)
-------------------------------------------

25723.

On or before January 31, 2003, the commission, in consultation with any other state agency that the commission deems necessary, shall develop and adopt recommendations for consideration by the Governor and the Legislature of a California State Fuel-Efficient Tire Program. The commission shall make recommendations on all of the following items:

(a) Establishing a test procedure for measuring tire fuel efficiency.

(b) Development of a data base of fuel efficiency of existing tires in order to establish an accurate baseline of tire efficiency.

(c) A rating system for tires that provides consumers with information on the fuel efficiency of individual tire models.

(d) A consumer-friendly system to disseminate tire fuel-efficiency information as broadly as possible. The commission shall consider labeling, Web site listing, printed fuel economy guide booklets, and mandatory requirements for tire retailers to provide fuel-efficiency information.

(e) A study to determine the safety implications, if any, of different policies to promote fuel efficient replacement tires in the consumer market.

(f) A mandatory fuel-efficiency standard for all after market tires sold in California.

(g) Consumer incentive programs that would offer a rebate to purchasers of replacement tires that are more fuel efficient than the average replacement tire.

(History: Added by Stats. 2001, Ch. 912, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

25724.

(a) Beginning no later than the 2024–25 fiscal year, the Department of General Services shall ensure that at least 50 percent of the light-duty vehicles purchased for the state vehicle fleet each fiscal year are zero-emission vehicles.

(b) This section shall not apply to vehicles that have special performance requirements necessary for the protection of public safety, as defined by the Department of General Services.

(c) (1) If the Department of General Services determines that it cannot meet the needs of the state while fulfilling the requirements of this section, the department shall hold a
 public hearing to make that finding, notify the Secretary of State of the finding, and cease to implement this section.

(2) The Department of General Services may base the finding required pursuant to paragraph (1) on a determination that fulfilling the requirements of this section would result in costs that are not substantially absorbable by the department when purchasing those light-duty vehicles.

(History: Added by Stats. 2017, Ch. 628, Sec. 3.   (SB 498)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

25724.4.

(a) The installation of electric vehicle supply equipment or supporting electrical and hydrogen fueling infrastructure by state entities to support state fleet operations pursuant to subdivision (d) of Section 599.808 of Title 2 of the California Code of Regulations shall not be construed to be gifts of public funds in violation of Section 6 of Article XVI of the California Constitution.

(b) State entities shall not be required to recover electric vehicle supply equipment upon the separation of a state employee.

(c) For purposes of this section, “electric vehicle supply equipment (EVSE)” means the unit that controls the power supply to one or more vehicles during a charging
 session.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 360, Sec. 3.   (SB 1010)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 8.4. Local Vehicle Fleet [25725. - 25726.]

25725.

When awarding a vehicle procurement contract, every city, county, city and county, and special district, including a school district and a community college district may evaluate and score fuel economy, in addition to other life-cycle factors, in choosing passenger cars or light-duty trucks, or both, with the lowest life-cycle costs.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2007, Ch. 593, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------

25726.

(a) When awarding a vehicle procurement contract, every city, county, city and county, and special district, including a school district and a community college district may require that 75 percent of the passenger cars or light-duty trucks, or both, to be acquired be energy-efficient vehicles.

(b) “Energy-efficient vehicle” means either of the following:

(1) A vehicle that meets California’s Super Ultra-Low Emission Vehicle (SULEV) standard for exhaust emissions and the federal inherently low-emission vehicle (ILEV) evaporative emission standard, as defined in Part 88 (commencing with Section 88.101-94) of Title 40 of the Code of Federal Regulations.

(2) A hybrid vehicle or an alternative fuel vehicle that meets California’s advanced technology partial zero-emission vehicle (AT PZEV) standard for criteria pollutant emissions.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2007, Ch. 593, Sec. 5.   Effective January 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 8.6. Renewable Energy Resources Program [25740. - 25751.]

25740.

It is the intent of the Legislature in establishing this program, to increase the amount of electricity generated from eligible renewable energy resources per year, so that it equals at least 33 percent of total retail sales of electricity in California per year by December 31, 2020.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 1, Sec. 4.   (SB 2 1x)   Effective December 10, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

25740.5.

Notwithstanding any other law, moneys collected for renewable energy pursuant to Article 15 (commencing with Section 399) of Chapter 2.3 of Part 1 of Division 1 of the Public Utilities Code shall be transferred to the Renewable Resource Trust Fund. Moneys collected between January 1, 2007, and January 1, 2012, shall be used for the purposes specified in this chapter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 39, Sec. 98.   (SB 1018)   Effective June 27, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

25741.

As used in this chapter, all of the following definitions apply:

(a) “Renewable electrical generation facility” means a facility that meets all of the following criteria:

(1) The facility meets either of the following criteria:

(A) The facility uses biomass, solar thermal, photovoltaic, wind, geothermal, fuel cells or linear generators using fuels described in this paragraph that otherwise meet the requirements of this subdivision, small hydroelectric generation of 30 megawatts or less, digester gas, municipal solid waste conversion, landfill gas, ocean wave, ocean thermal, or tidal current, and any additions or enhancements to the facility using that
 technology.

(B) The facility converts hydrogen gas to electricity in a turbine and meets all of the following criteria:

(i) The hydrogen used in the turbine is solely derived from an eligible renewable resource described in subparagraph (A) or through the electrolysis of water, and exclusively uses electricity generated from another renewable electrical generation facility. Any fraction of hydrogen produced through the use of nonrenewable fuels or nonrenewable electricity shall not be eligible to satisfy the requirements of this section.

(ii) The electricity used to derive the hydrogen is not also counted toward a
 compliance obligation pursuant to the California Renewables Portfolio Standard Program (Article 16 (commencing with Section 399.11) of Chapter 2.3 of Part 1 of Division 1 of the Public Utilities Code) or claimed as renewable generation for any other state program.

(iii) The facility provides the commission with confirmation from the air quality management district or air pollution control district that the facility’s turbine has the capacity to use a fuel for which hydrogen comprises a sufficient quantity of the blend by volume,
 but not below 20 percent by volume, to achieve a measurable reduction in greenhouse gas emissions.

(iv) The facility has submitted information on the hydrogen production process, as specified by the commission. For electrolytic production, the operator shall demonstrate, for the production process, hourly matching of hydrogen production with renewable energy generation starting January 1, 2030.

(v) The manufacturing of the hydrogen does not result in resource shuffling, as independently determined by the commission based on regional
 impacts of hydrogen production on zero-carbon generation, local air pollution, and fossil fuel generation.

(vi) The manufacturing of the hydrogen does not use unbundled renewable energy credits.

(vii) The
 facility provides the commission with confirmation from the air quality management district or air pollution control district that the combustion of hydrogen will result in a net decrease of air pollutants and of greenhouse gas emissions from the electrical sector and will not increase the oxides of nitrogen emissions rate from the turbine compared to natural gas.

(viii) The hydrogen is physically delivered to the turbine.

(2) The facility satisfies one of the following requirements:

(A) The facility is located in the state or near the border of the state with the first point of connection to the transmission network of a balancing authority area primarily located within the state. For purposes of this subparagraph, “balancing authority area” has the same meaning as defined in Section 399.12 of the Public Utilities Code.

(B) The facility has its first point of interconnection to the transmission network outside the state, within the Western Electricity Coordinating Council (WECC) service area, and satisfies all of the following requirements:

(i) It commences initial commercial operation after January 1, 2005.

(ii) It will not cause or contribute to a violation of a California environmental quality standard or requirement.

(iii) It participates in the accounting system to verify compliance with the renewables portfolio standard established by the commission pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 399.25 of the Public Utilities Code.

(C) The facility meets the requirements of clauses (ii) and (iii) of subparagraph (B), but does not meet the requirements of clause (i) of subparagraph (B) because it commenced initial operation before January 1, 2005, if the facility satisfies either of the following requirements:

(i) The electricity is from incremental generation resulting from expansion or repowering of the facility.

(ii) Electricity generated by the facility was procured by a retail seller or local publicly owned electric utility as of January 1, 2010.

(3) If the facility is outside the United States, it is developed and operated in a manner that is as protective of the environment as a similar facility located in the state.

(4) If eligibility of the facility is based on the use of landfill gas, digester gas, or another renewable fuel delivered to the facility through a common carrier pipeline, the transaction for the procurement of that fuel, including the source of the fuel and delivery method, satisfies the requirements of Section 399.12.6 of the Public Utilities Code and is verified pursuant to the accounting system established by the commission pursuant to Section 399.25 of the Public Utilities Code, or a comparable system, as determined by the commission.

(b) “Municipal solid waste conversion” means a technology that uses a noncombustion thermal process to
 convert solid waste to a clean-burning fuel for the purpose of generating electricity, and that meets all of the following criteria:

(1) The technology does not use air or oxygen in the conversion process, except ambient air to maintain temperature control.

(2) The technology produces no discharges of air contaminants or emissions, including greenhouse gases as defined in Section 38505 of the Health and Safety Code.

(3) The technology produces no discharges to surface or groundwaters of the state.

(4) The technology produces no hazardous wastes.

(5) To the maximum extent feasible, the technology removes all recyclable materials and marketable green waste compostable materials from the
 solid waste stream before the conversion process and the owner or operator of the facility certifies that those materials will be recycled or composted.

(6) The facility at which the technology is used is in compliance with all applicable laws, regulations, and ordinances.

(7) The technology meets any other conditions established by the commission.

(8) The facility certifies that any local agency sending solid waste to the facility diverted at least 30 percent of all solid waste it collects through solid waste reduction, recycling, and composting. For purposes of this paragraph, “local agency” means any city, county, or special district, or subdivision thereof, that is authorized to provide solid waste handling services.

(c) “Renewable energy public
 goods charge” means that portion of the nonbypassable system benefits charge required to be collected to fund renewable energy pursuant to the Reliable Electric Service Investments Act (Article 15 (commencing with Section 399) of Chapter 2.3 of Part 1 of Division 1 of the Public Utilities Code).

(d) “Report” means the report entitled “Investing in Renewable Electricity Generation in California” (June 2001, Publication Number P500-00-022) submitted to the Governor and the Legislature by the commission.

(e) “Retail seller” has the same meaning as defined in Section 399.12 of the Public Utilities Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2026, Ch. 35, Sec. 1.   (SB 1350)   Effective June 29, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

25744.5.

The commission shall allocate and use funding available for emerging renewable technologies pursuant to Section 25751 to fund photovoltaic and solar thermal electric technologies in accordance with eligibility criteria and conditions established pursuant to Chapter 8.8 (commencing with Section 25780).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 39, Sec. 102.   (SB 1018)   Effective June 27, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

25746.

If the commission provides funding for a regional accounting system to verify compliance with the renewables portfolio standard by retail sellers, pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 399.25 of the Public Utilities Code, the commission shall recover all costs from user fees.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 39, Sec. 103.   (SB 1018)   Effective June 27, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

25747.

(a) The commission shall adopt guidelines governing the funding programs authorized under this chapter, at a publicly noticed meeting offering all interested parties an opportunity to comment. Substantive changes to the guidelines shall not be adopted without at least 10 days’ written notice to the public. The public notice of meetings required by this subdivision shall not be less than 30 days. Notwithstanding any other law, any guidelines adopted pursuant to this chapter or Section 399.25 of the Public Utilities Code, shall be exempt from the requirements of Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code. The Legislature declares that the changes made to this subdivision by the act amending this section during the 2002 portion of the 2001–02 Regular Session are declaratory
 of, and not a change in, existing law.

(b) Funds to further the purposes of this chapter may be committed for multiple years.

(c) Awards made pursuant to this chapter are grants, subject to appeal to the commission upon a showing that factors other than those described in the guidelines adopted by the commission were applied in making the awards and payments. Any actions taken by an applicant to apply for, or become or remain eligible and registered to receive, payments or awards, including satisfying conditions specified by the commission, shall not constitute the rendering of goods, services, or a direct benefit to the commission.

(d) An award made pursuant to this chapter, the amount of the award, and the terms and conditions of the grant are public information.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 162, Sec. 152.   (SB 1171)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

25751.

(a) The Renewable Resource Trust Fund is hereby created in the State Treasury.

(b) The Emerging Renewable Resources Account is hereby established within the Renewable Resources Trust Fund. Notwithstanding Section 13340 of the Government Code, the moneys in the account are hereby continuously appropriated to the commission without regard to fiscal years for the following purposes:

(1) To close out the award of incentives for emerging technologies in accordance with former Section 25744, as this law existed prior to the enactment of the Budget Act of 2012, for which applications had been approved before the enactment of the Budget Act of 2012.

(2) To close out consumer education activities in accordance with former Section 25746, as this law existed prior to the enactment of the Budget Act of 2012.

(3) To provide funding for the New Solar Homes Partnership pursuant to paragraph (3) of subdivision (e) of Section 2851 of the Public Utilities Code.

(c) The Controller shall provide to the commission funds pursuant to the continuous appropriation in, and for purposes specified in, subdivision (b).

(d) The Controller shall provide to the commission moneys from the fund sufficient to satisfy all contract and grant awards that were made by the commission pursuant to former Sections 25744 and 25746, and Chapter 8.8 (commencing with Section 25780), as these laws existed prior to the enactment of the
 Budget Act of 2012.

(e) If the Public Utilities Commission determines that the commission should be the third-party administrator for the New Solar Homes Partnership Program pursuant to subparagraph (A) of paragraph (3) of subdivision (e) of Section 2851 of the Public Utilities Code, any moneys made available to fund the New Solar Homes Partnership Program shall be deposited into the Emerging Renewable Resources Account of the Renewable Resource Trust Fund and used for this purpose.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 341, Sec. 6.   (SB 840)   Effective September 13, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 8.7. Replacement Tire Efficiency Program [25770. - 25773.]

25770.

For the purposes of this chapter, the following terms have the following meanings:

(a) “Board” means the California Integrated Waste Management Board established pursuant to Division 30 (commencing with Section 40000).

(b) “Consumer information requirement” means point-of-sale information or signs that are conspicuously displayed, readily accessible, and written in a manner that can be easily understood by the consumer. “Consumer information requirement” does not include mandatory labeling, imprinting, or other marking, on an individual tire by the tire manufacturer or the tire retailer.

(c) “Cost effective” means the cost savings to the consumer resulting from a replacement tire subject to an energy efficiency standard that equals or exceeds the additional cost to the consumer resulting from the standard, taking into account the expected fuel cost savings over the expected life of the replacement tire.

(d) “Replacement tire” means a tire sold in the state that is designed to replace a tire sold with a new passenger car or light-duty truck. “Replacement tire” does not include any of the following tires:

(1) A tire or group of tires with the same SKU, plant, and year, for which the volume of tires produced or imported is less than 15,000 annually.

(2) A deep tread, winter-type snow tire, a space-saver tire, or a temporary use spare tire.

(3) A tire with a nominal rim diameter of 12 inches or less.

(4) A motorcycle tire.

(5) A tire manufactured specifically for use in an off-road motorized recreational vehicle.

(History: Added by Stats. 2003, Ch. 645, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

25771.

On or before July 1, 2006, the commission shall develop and adopt all of the following:

(a) A database of the energy efficiency of a representative sample of replacement tires sold in the state, based on test procedures adopted by the commission.

(b) Based on the data collected pursuant to subdivision (a), a rating system for the energy efficiency of replacement tires sold in the state, that will enable consumers to make more informed decisions when purchasing tires for their vehicles.

(c) Based on the test procedures adopted pursuant to subdivision (a) and the rating system established pursuant to subdivision (b), requirements for tire manufacturers to report to the commission the energy efficiency of replacement tires sold in the state.

(History: Added by Stats. 2003, Ch. 645, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

25772.

On or before July 1, 2007, the commission, in consultation with the board, shall, after appropriate notice and workshops, adopt and, on or before July 1, 2008, implement, a tire energy efficiency program of statewide applicability for replacement tires, designed to ensure that replacement tires sold in the state are at least as energy efficient, on average, as tires sold in the state as original equipment on new passenger cars and light-duty trucks.

(History: Added by Stats. 2003, Ch. 645, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

25773.

(a) The program described in Section 25772 shall include all of the following:

(1) The development and adoption of minimum energy efficiency standards for replacement tires, except to the extent that the commission determines that it is unable to do so in a manner that complies with subparagraphs (A) to (E), inclusive. Energy efficiency standards adopted pursuant to this paragraph shall meet all of the following conditions:

(A) Be technically feasible and cost effective.

(B) Not adversely affect tire safety.

(C) Not adversely affect the average tire life of replacement tires.

(D) Not adversely affect state efforts to manage scrap tires pursuant to Chapter 17 (commencing with Section 42860) of Part 3 of Division 30.

(2) The development and adoption of consumer information requirements for replacement tires for which standards have been adopted pursuant to paragraph (1).

(b) The energy efficiency standards established pursuant to paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) shall be based on the results of laboratory testing and, to the extent it is available and deemed appropriate by the commission, an onroad fleet testing program developed by tire manufacturers in consultation with the commission and the board, conducted by tire manufacturers, and submitted to the commission on or before January 1, 2006.

(c) If the commission finds that tires used to equip an authorized emergency vehicle, as defined in Section 165 of the Vehicle Code, are unable to meet the standards established pursuant to paragraph (1) of subdivision (a), the commission shall authorize an operator of an authorized emergency vehicle fleet to purchase for those vehicles tires that do not meet those standards.

(d) The commission, in consultation with the board, shall review and revise the program, including any standards adopted pursuant to the program, as necessary, but not less than once every three years. The commission may not revise the program or standards in a way that reduces the average efficiency of replacement tires.

(History: Added by Stats. 2003, Ch. 645, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 8.8. California Solar Initiative [25780. - 25784.]

25780.

The Legislature finds and declares both of the following:

(a) It is the goal of the state to install solar energy systems with a generation capacity equivalent of 3,000 megawatts, to establish a self-sufficient solar industry in which solar energy systems are a viable mainstream option for both homes and businesses in 10 years, and to place solar energy systems on 50 percent of new homes in 13 years.

(b) A solar initiative should be a cost-effective investment by ratepayers in peak electricity generation capacity where ratepayers recoup the cost of their investment through lower rates as a result of avoiding purchases of electricity at peak rates, with additional system reliability and pollution reduction benefits.

(History: Added by Stats. 2006, Ch. 132, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

25781.

As used in this chapter, the following terms have the following meanings:

(a) “California Solar Initiative” means the program providing ratepayer funded incentives for eligible solar energy systems adopted by the Public Utilities Commission in Decision 06-01-024.

(b) “kW” means kilowatts or 1,000 watts, as measured from the alternating current side of the solar energy system inverter consistent with Section 223 of Title 15 of the United States Code.

(c) “kWh” means kilowatthours, as measured by the number of kilowatts generated in an hour.

(d) “MW” means megawatts or 1,000,000 watts.

(e) “Solar energy system” means a solar energy device that has the primary purpose of providing for the collection and distribution of solar energy for the generation of electricity, that produces at least one kW, and not more than five MW, alternating current rated peak electricity, and that meets or exceeds the eligibility criteria established pursuant to Section 25782.

(History: Added by Stats. 2006, Ch. 132, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

25782.

(a) The commission shall, by January 1, 2008, in consultation with the Public Utilities Commission, local publicly owned electric utilities, and interested members of the public, establish eligibility criteria for solar energy systems receiving ratepayer funded incentives that include all of the following:

(1) Design, installation, and electrical output standards or incentives.

(2) The solar energy system is intended primarily to offset part or all of the consumer’s own electricity demand.

(3) All components in the solar energy system are new and unused, and have not previously been placed in service in any other location or for any other application.

(4) The solar energy system has a warranty of not less than 10 years to protect against defects and undue degradation of electrical generation output.

(5) The solar energy system is located on the same premises of the end-use consumer where the consumer’s own electricity demand is located.

(6) The solar energy system is connected to the electrical corporation’s electrical distribution system within the state.

(7) The solar energy system has meters or other devices in place to monitor and measure the system’s performance and the quantity of electricity generated by the system.

(8) The solar energy system is installed in conformance with the manufacturer’s specifications and in compliance with all applicable electrical and building code standards.

(b) The commission shall establish conditions on ratepayer funded incentives that require all of the following:

(1) Appropriate siting and high quality installation of the solar energy system by developing installation guidelines that maximize the performance of the system and prevent qualified systems from being inefficiently or inappropriately installed. The conditions established by the commission shall not impact housing designs or densities presently authorized by a city, county, or city and county. The goal of this paragraph is to achieve efficient installation of solar energy systems to promote the greatest energy production per ratepayer dollar.

(2) Optimal solar energy system performance during periods of peak electricity demand.

(3) Appropriate energy efficiency improvements in the new or existing home or commercial structure where the solar energy system is installed.

(c) The commission shall set rating standards for equipment, components, and systems to assure reasonable performance and shall develop standards that provide for compliance with the minimum ratings.

(d) Upon establishment of eligibility criteria pursuant to subdivision (a), no ratepayer funded incentives shall be made for a solar energy system that does not meet the eligibility criteria.

(History: Added by Stats. 2006, Ch. 132, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

25783.

The commission shall do all the following:

(a) Publish educational materials designed to demonstrate how builders may incorporate solar energy systems during construction as well as energy efficiency measures that best complement solar energy systems.

(b) Develop and publish the estimated annual electrical generation and savings for solar energy systems. The estimates shall vary by climate zone, type of system, size, life cycle costs, electricity prices, and other factors the commission determines to be relevant to a consumer when making a purchasing decision.

(c) Provide assistance to builders and contractors. The assistance may include technical workshops, training, educational materials, and related research.

(d) The commission shall annually conduct random audits of solar energy systems to evaluate their operational performance.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2008, Ch. 627, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2009.)
-------------------------------------------

25784.

The commission shall adopt guidelines for solar energy systems receiving ratepayer funded incentives at a publicly noticed meeting offering all interested parties an opportunity to comment. Not less than 30 days’ public notice shall be given of the meeting required by this section, before the commission initially adopts guidelines. Substantive changes to the guidelines shall not be adopted without at least 10 days’ written notice to the public. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, any guidelines adopted pursuant to this chapter shall be exempt from the requirements of Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 2006, Ch. 132, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 8.9. Strategic Reliability Reserve [25790. - 25795.5.]



  ARTICLE 1. General Provisions and Definitions [25790. - 25790.5.]

25790.

The Legislature finds and declares all of the following:

(a) California is a leader in driving the affordable and equitable transition to a clean reliable energy system and economy. However, the impacts of climate change are occurring sooner and with more intensity and frequency than previously anticipated.

(b) Extreme events from climate change, including heat waves, wildfires, and drought, combined with other factors, such as supply chain disruptions, are jeopardizing California’s ability to build out the electrical infrastructure needed to maintain affordability and reliability.

(c) As California transitions to a clean energy
 future and contends with climate impacts and other challenges, sufficient capacity of new and existing generation assets will be required to maintain reliability during extreme events.

(d) California must ensure electricity reliability during this period of heightened risk, which includes extraordinary near-term measures and substantive changes to mid-term energy policy, while also ensuring the multifaceted California electrical grid is best positioned to sustainably and equitably achieve California’s clean energy future, climate targets, and air quality requirements.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 61, Sec. 6.   (AB 205)   Effective June 30, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

25790.5.

For purposes of this chapter, the following definitions apply:

(a) “California balancing authority” has the same meaning set forth in Section 399.12 of the Public Utilities Code.

(b) “Extreme event” means either of the following:

(1) An event occurring at a time and place in which weather, climate, or environmental conditions, including temperature, precipitation, drought, fire, or flooding, present a level of risk that would constitute or exceed a one-in-ten event, as referred to by the North American Electric Reliability Corporation, including when forecast in advance by a load-serving entity or local publicly owned electric
 utility.

(2) An event where emergency measures are taken by a California balancing authority, including when forecast in advance by the California balancing authority.

(c) “Fund” means the Strategic Reliability Reserve Fund established pursuant to Section 25793.

(d) “Load-serving entity” has the same meaning as defined in Section 380 of the Public Utilities Code.

(e) “Local publicly owned electric utility” has the same meaning as defined in Section 224.3 of the Public Utilities Code.

(f) “State board” means the State Air Resources Board.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 61, Sec. 6.   (AB 205)   Effective June 30, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Distributed Electricity Backup Assets Program [25791. - 25791.5.]

25791.

(a) The Distributed Electricity Backup Assets Program is hereby created. The commission shall implement and administer the program to incentivize the construction of cleaner and more efficient distributed energy assets that would serve as on-call emergency supply or load reduction for the state’s electrical grid during extreme events.

(b) In implementing and administering the program, the commission, in coordination with the state board, shall allocate moneys for either of the following:

(1) Efficiency upgrades, maintenance, and capacity additions to existing power generators, consistent with subdivision (e).

(2) Deployment of new zero- or low-emission technologies, including, but not limited to, fuel cells or energy storage, at existing or new facilities.

(c) The commission shall develop guidelines, in consultation with the state board, to implement the program. The guidelines shall include a loading order that aims to achieve electricity reliability and prioritizes feasible, cost-effective demand response and efficiency resources, then feasible, cost-effective renewable and zero-emission resources, and then feasible, cost-effective conventional resources. The guidelines shall also consider the anticipated useful life of the resources in relation to the state’s climate and air quality requirements.

(d) The state board, in consultation with air pollution control districts and air quality management districts, as appropriate, shall identify the cleanest available
 technologies and equipment that would qualify for the incentives for backup generators under the guidelines, inclusive of the emissions of greenhouse gases, criteria air pollutants, and toxic emissions associated with obtaining and using feedstock fuels.

(e) The commission, in consultation with the state board, may fund new efficiency upgrades, maintenance, and incremental capacity additions to existing power generators. As a condition of the receipt of funds for this purpose, as applicable, generator operators shall comply with regulations adopted pursuant to Part 2 (commencing with Section 38530) of, and Part 5 (commencing with Section 38570) of, the California Global Warming Solutions Act of 2006 (Division 25.5 (commencing with Section 38500) of the Health and Safety Code), including, but not limited to, the mandatory reporting of emissions of greenhouse gasses and market-based compliance mechanism.

(f) All funding recipients under the program shall participate as an on-call emergency resource for the state during extreme events.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 61, Sec. 6.   (AB 205)   Effective June 30, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

25791.5.

The commission shall transfer moneys from the Distributed Electricity Backup Assets Account to the state board to be used in the Climate Heat Impact Response Program established pursuant to the proclamation of a state of emergency issued by Governor Gavin Newsom on July 31, 2021.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 61, Sec. 6.   (AB 205)   Effective June 30, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Demand Side Grid Support Program [25792. - 25792.]

25792.

(a) The Demand Side Grid Support Program is hereby created. The commission shall implement and administer the program to incentivize dispatchable customer load reduction and backup generation operation as on-call emergency supply and load reduction for the state’s electrical grid during extreme events.

(b) The commission shall allocate moneys to develop a new statewide program that provides incentives to reduce customer net load during extreme events with upfront capacity commitments and for per-unit reductions in net load. Eligible recipients may include all energy customers in the state, except those enrolled in demand response or emergency load reduction programs offered by entities under the jurisdiction of the Public Utilities Commission. The commission, in
 consultation with the Public Utilities Commission, may adopt additional participation requirements or limitations. Payments shall be made to any of the following:

(1) Participating individual entities.

(2) Participating aggregators of multiple energy customers.

(3) Participating local publicly owned electric utilities and load-serving entities.

(c) Participants shall provide load reduction or backup generation service, or both, in response to a dispatch by an applicable California balancing authority of a California balancing authority area in which participants are located during extreme events.

(d) The commission, in consultation with California balancing authorities and the state board,